Utah statutes.
10-3-916.   Appointment of recorder and treasurer in a city of third,
fourth, or fifth class or a town -- Vacancies in office.
(1)  In each city of the third, fourth, or fifth class and in each town, on or
before the first Monday in February following a municipal election, the mayor,
with the advice and consent of the city council, shall appoint a qualified
person to each of the offices of city recorder and treasurer.
(2)  The city recorder is ex officio the city auditor and shall perform the
duties of that office.
(3)  The mayor, with the advice and consent of the council, may also appoint
and fill vacancies in all offices provided for by law or ordinance.
(4)  All appointed officers shall continue in office until their successors
are appointed and qualified.
